District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0854.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act
36 may be cited as the “Saint Elizabeths Hospital Independence and Governance Amendment Act of
37 2026”.
38 TITLE I. ESTABLISHMENT OF SAINT ELIZABETHS HOSPITAL AS AN
39 INDEPENDENT AGENCY.

40 Sec. 101. Definitions.
41 For the purposes of this title, the term:
42 (1) “Board” means the Board of Directors of the Hospital established by section 103.
43 (2) “Chief Executive Officer” means the Chief Executive Officer of the Hospital appointed by
44 the Board pursuant to section 104.
45 (3) “Chief Medical Officer” means the Hospital’s senior clinical executive, who shall be a
46 physician licensed to practice medicine in the District and board-certified in psychiatry, and who is
47 responsible for overseeing the quality, safety, coordination, and professional standards of clinical care
48 provided by the Hospital.
49 (4) “Department” means the Department of Behavioral Health.
50 (5) “Director” means the Director of the Department.
51 (6) “Discharge ready” means the Hospital treating clinical team’s assessment that a patient no
52 longer requires inpatient psychiatric hospitalization and may be safely discharged to an identified type
53 or level of care, with or without conditions.
54 (7) “Fund” means the Saint Elizabeths Hospital Fund established by section 110.
55 (8) “The Joint Commission” means the independent, nonprofit organization that accredits and
56 certifies health-care organizations and programs in the United States, or its successor organization.
57 (9) “Hospital” means the psychiatric hospital operated by the District, known as Saint
58 Elizabeths Hospital.
59 (10) “National Capital Region” means the District of Columbia, Montgomery County and
60 Price George’s County, Maryland, Arlington County, Fairfax County, Loudoun County, and Prince
61 William County, Virginia, and any municipality located within the geographic area bounded by the
62 outer boundaries of those counties.
2

63 (11) “Patient-rights advocate” means an individual or entity independent of Hospital
64 management that assists patients in understanding and exercising their rights and pursuing complaints
65 or grievances.
66 (12) “System partner” means a District agency or instrumentality whose functions materially
67 affect admissions to, treatment at, or discharge from the Hospital, including the Department,
68 Department of Healthcare Finance, Department of Human Services, Department of Disability
69 Services, Department of Aging and Community Livings, Department of Corrections, and District of
70 Columbia Housing Authority.
71 (13) “Written barrier-resolution plan” means a documented, individualized plan for resolving
72 each identified barrier that prevents or delays a patient’s discharge or transition to a less restrictive
73 appropriate setting, including the barrier, the actions necessary to resolve it, the person or entitle
74 responsible for each action, applicable deadlines, and the process for escalating an unresolved barrier.
75 Sec. 102. Establishment and purpose.
76 (a) There is established, as an independent agency of the District government, Saint Elizabeths
77 Hospital, which shall be governed by a Board of Directors established in section 103.
78 (b) The purpose of the Hospital shall be to serve as the District’s primary public psychiatric
79 hospital and provide high-quality, safe, therapeutic, recovery-oriented, trauma-informed, and rights-
80 protecting psychiatric services in the least restrictive appropriate setting and support timely transition
81 of patients to community-based services.
82 (c) The Hospital shall:
83 (1) Operate and maintain a psychiatric hospital in the District and its programs,
84 including clinical, education, research, and training programs;
3

85 (2) Provide Maintain all licenses, certifications, and accreditations required for
86 operation of the Hospital, including for compliance, risk-management, and patient safety procedures,
87 and apply for Joint Commission accreditation within 24 months after the transfer date;
88 (3) Provide inpatient psychiatric treatment and hospital-based forensic and
89 competency-restoration services;
90 (4) Protect patient rights and promote clinical quality, safety, workforce stability, fiscal
91 stewardship, and public accountability; and
92 (5) Coordinate with the Department and other system partners to align with the
93 District’s behavioral health continuum policies.
94
95 Sec. 103. Board of Directors; establishment and membership.
96 (a)(1) There is established a Board of Directors to govern the Hospital, which shall consist
97 of 13 members, 11 of whom shall be voting members, and 2 of whom shall be nonvoting ex officio
98 members.
99 (2) The 11 voting members shall be appointed by the Mayor with the advice and
100 consent of the Council pursuant to section 2 of the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March 3,
101 1979 (D.C. Law 2-142; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01), as follows:
102 (A) At least one member who shall be a psychiatrist licensed in the District
103 with experience in public or inpatient psychiatry;
104 (B) At least one member who shall be licensed registered nurse with
105 experience in psychiatric hospital care;
106 (C) At least one member who shall be an individual with substantial
107 experience managing a hospital or integrated healthcare delivery system;
4

108 (D) At least one member who shall be an individual with expertise in
109 healthcare finance, accounting, or public budgeting;
110 (E) At least one member who shall be an individual who is a licensed
111 attorney in the District with expertise in disability rights, forensic mental health law, or patient
112 rights;
113 (F) At least 2 members with lived experience of mental illness or inpatient
114 psychiatric treatment, or who are family members of such individuals, at least one of whom has
115 experience relevant to forensic behavioral health services;
116 (G) At least one member who shall be an individual with expertise in
117 workforce development, labor relations, or human resources; and
118 (H) At least one member who shall be an individual who is the current or
119 former representative of a labor organization representing Hospital employees and who is not
120 employed by the Hospital during the member’s tenure on the Board.
121 (3) The Chief Executive Officer established by section 104 and the Chief Medical
122 Officer shall serve as ex officio members.
123 (b) At least 7 of the voting members shall be District residents; except, that each of the 11
124 voting members shall maintain a primary residence or primary place of business in the National
125 Capital Region.
126 (c)(1) A voting member may not during their tenure on the Board provide goods or services
127 to the Hospital, be employed by an entity providing goods or services to the Hospital, or have a
128 financial interest that would impair, or have the appearance of impairing, their independent
129 judgment as a fiduciary of the Hospital.
130 (2) No voting member may be an employee of the Hospital or the Department.
5

131 (d)(1) Voting members shall serve 4-year terms and may serve no more than 2 consecutive
132 4-year terms.
133 (2) Of the voting members first appointed to the Board, 3 members shall be
134 appointed for a one-year term, 3 members shall be appointed for a 2-year term, 3 members shall be
135 appointed for a 3-year term, and 2 members shall be appointed for a 4-year term.
136 (3) A vacancy on the Board shall be filled in the same manner that the original
137 appointment was made. A member appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve for the unexpired portion
138 of the term.
139 (4) A member may continue to serve until a successor is appointed and confirmed;
140 except, that the holdover period shall not be longer than 180 days after expiration of the member’s
141 term.
142 (e) The Board shall annually elect a chair and vice-chair from among its voting members;
143 provided, that the ex officio members may not serve as chair or vice-chair.
144 (f) A voting member shall not receive compensation but may be reimbursed for actual and
145 necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties as a voting member of the
146 Board.
147 (g) A Board member shall not be held personally liable for an action taken in good faith in
148 the course of official duties. The Hospital shall maintain, or provide indemnification consistent
149 with, errors-and-omissions and directors-and-officers insurance for Board members and officers, as
150 provided in section 115.
151 Sec. 104. Board governance, meetings, and fiduciary duties.
152 (a) Each voting member shall discharge the duties of office in good faith, with the care an
153 ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, and in a
6

154 manner the member reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the Hospital, its patients, and
155 its public mission.
156 (b) The Board shall adopt conflict-of-interest and recusal policies, a code of conduct, and
157 rules for its proceedings within 90 days after its first meeting.
158 (c) The Board shall convene a regular meeting at least once a month. A majority of the
159 voting members then serving shall constitute a quorum, and an affirmative vote of a majority of
160 voting members present shall be required for official action.
161 (d) The Board shall allow public comment at each regular meeting and shall hold at least
162 one annual public meeting focused on the Hospital's strategic plan, quality performance, patient
163 rights, workforce, finances, and community coordination.
164 (e) The Board shall establish, at a minimum:
165 (1) A committee responsible for oversight of the Hospital’s finances, budget, audits,
166 internal controls, contracting, and financial risk, which shall be chaired by a Board member with
167 financial expertise; and
168 (2) A committee responsible for oversight of Board governance, ethics, member
169 training and performance, workforce planning, staffing, recruitment, retention, and labor relations.
170 (f) A committee may include non-Board advisors, but only Board members may vote. A
171 committee may not exercise authority reserved to the full Board by law or rule.
172 (g) Board members shall complete initial and annual training concerning hospital
173 governance, public fiduciary duties, behavioral-health law, patient rights, disability rights, forensic
174 services, confidentiality, ethics, and trauma-informed care.
175
176 Sec. 105. Chief Executive Officer; appointment and duties.
7

177 (a) The Board shall appoint a Chief Executive Officer who shall be the chief administrative
178 officer of the Hospital. The Chief Executive Officer shall serve at the pleasure of the Board. The Chief
179 Executive Officer shall be a District resident throughout their term and failure to maintain District
180 residency shall result in a forfeiture of the position.
181 (b) The Chief Financial Officer shall have substantial executive experience in hospital or
182 complex health-system management, psychiatric care, and demonstrated competence in quality,
183 workforce, financial, and public-sector accountability.
184 (c) The Chief Executive Officer shall provide the Board with a monthly operations report and
185 such additional reports as the Board's rules may require.
186 (d) The Board shall conduct a written annual evaluation of the Chief Executive Officer based
187 on measurable performance standards that include quality and safety, patient rights, workforce
188 stability, discharge timeliness, regulatory compliance, financial performance, and transparency.
189 Sec. 106. Quality, Safety, and Patient Rights Committee.
190 (a)(1) There is established a Quality, Safety, and Patient Rights Committee of the Board to
191 provide independent, patient-centered oversight of the quality and safety of care, protection of patient
192 rights, adequacy of the Hospital workforce, compliance with applicable standards, and the Hospital’s
193 response to deficiencies.
194 (2) The Committee shall:
195 (A) Identify systemic risks to patient health, safety, rights, and recovery;
196 (B) Monitor the Hospital’s quality assurance, performance improvement,
197 patient safety, and corrective action activities;
198 (C) Elevate the perspectives of patients, families, advocates, and direct care
199 employees in the governance of the Hospital;
8

200 (D) Advise the Board concerning policies, resources, and actions necessary to
201 improve clinical outcomes, patient safety, patient rights, workforce stability, and discharge practices;
202 and
203 (E) Monitor whether deficiencies identified by regulators, accrediting
204 organizations, auditors, advocates, patients, employees, or the Committee are timely and effectively
205 corrected.
206 (b)(1) The Committee shall consist of 9 voting members appointed by the Board as
207 follows:
208 (A) Three members of the Board, one of whom shall be designated by the
209 Board to serve as the chairperson, who shall have expertise in clinical quality, patient safety, disability
210 rights, patient rights, or inpatient psychiatric care; and
211 (B) Six individuals who shall not be members of the Board, including:
212 (i) One physician licensed to practice medicine in the District who is
213 board certified in psychiatry and has experience in inpatient psychiatric care, forensic psychiatric care,
214 or hospital quality and patient safety;
215 (ii) One registered nurse licensed in the District who has experience
216 providing inpatient psychiatric care;
217 (iii) One individual with at least 5 years expertise in hospital quality
218 improvement, patient safety, regulatory compliance, or hospital accreditation;
219 (iv) One individual with disability rights, patient rights, or protection
220 and advocacy for individuals with behavioral health conditions;
221 (v) One individual with lived experience receiving inpatient psychiatric
222 treatment; and
9

223 (vi) One family member, guardian, or personal representative of an
224 individual who has received inpatient psychiatric treatment.
225 (2) A current Hospital employee may serve in the committee position described in
226 paragraph (1)(B)(ii) of this subsection; provided, that the Board shall consult with labor organizations
227 representing Hospital employees in the appointment.
228 (3) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a non-Board member of the
229 Committee shall not be employed by the Hospital or the Department, provide goods or services to the
230 Hospital, be employed by an entity that provides goods or services to the Hospital, or otherwise have a
231 financial interested that would impair, or have the appearance of impairing, the member’s independent
232 judgment.
233 (4) The Chief Executive Officer, Chief Medical Officer, Chief Nursing Officer,
234 independent patient-rights advocate, and other Hospital officials designated by the Committee may
235 attend Committee meetings and provide information but shall not be voting members of the
236 Committee.
237 (5) Non-Board members shall serve 3-year terms and may serve for no more than 3
238 consecutive terms
239 (c)(1) The Committee shall meet at least once a month.
240 (2) The Committee shall have timely access to Hospital policies, aggregate and
241 deidentified data, incident reports, staffing information, regulatory findings, corrective-action plans,
242 and other information reasonably necessary to perform its duties. The Committee may access
243 individually identifiable patient information only in accordance with subsection (g) of this section.
10

244 (3) The Committee shall have direct access to Hospital employees, contractors, the
245 independent patient-rights advocate, patients who consent to communicate with the Committee
246 members, family members, legal representatives, and advocates.
247 (4) The Committee may conduct announced or unannounced visits to any Hospital unit,
248 consistent with applicable privacy, safety, security, and infection control requirements. Patients shall
249 be permitted to speak with Committee members.
250 (d) The Committee shall review quantitative and qualitative information concerning:
251 (1) Deaths, serious injuries, assaults, suicides and suicide attempts, elopements,
252 allegations of abuse or neglect, medication errors, serious reportable events, and the use and duration
253 of restraint and seclusion;
254 (2) Staffing levels, vacancies, turnover, overtime, use of contract staff, workplace
255 injuries, staff assaults, and other workforce conditions affecting patient care;
256 (3) The availability, timeliness, adequacy, and outcomes of psychiatric, medical,
257 nursing, psychological, rehabilitative, therapeutic, and competency-restoration services, including
258 readmissions and continuity of care;
259 (4) Grievances, complaints, substantiated rights violations, retaliation allegations, and
260 disparities in treatment, restrictive interventions, clinical outcomes, and discharge delays;
261 (5) Regulatory, licensing, accreditation, audit, protection-and-advocacy, and inspection
262 findings and related corrective-action plans; and
263 (6) Discharge delays, including the number of discharge-ready patients, the duration
264 and causes of delay, and barriers attributable to the Hospital, the Department, or another system
265 partner.
11

266 (e)(1) The Committee shall report material findings, risks, and recommendations to the Board
267 at least quarterly.
268 (2) Within 24 hours of learning of the condition, the chairperson shall notify the
269 Chairperson of the Board and the Chief Executive Officer of any condition that the Committee
270 reasonably believes poses an imminent threat to patient health or safety, a substantial violation of
271 patient rights, or a material threat to the Hospital’s licensure, certification, or accreditation.
272 (3) If the Committee identifies a systemic deficiency, it may recommend that the Board
273 require the Chief Executive Officer to prepare a time-limited corrective-action plan identifying
274 responsible officials, measurable actions, deadlines, necessary resources, and methods for determining
275 whether the corrective actions are effective.
276 (4) The Committee shall monitor the implementation of a corrective-action plan
277 required by the Board until the Board determines that the deficiency has been resolved.
278 (f) Meetings of the Committee shall not be closed to the public. Committee members and staff
279 shall maintain the confidentiality of patient, personnel, peer-review, quality-assurance, and other
280 protected information received in the performance of their duties. The Committee shall provide the
281 Board with regular reports that summarize its findings and recommendations without disclosing
282 protected information.
283 (g)(1) The Committee shall provide oversight and recommendations and shall not direct the
284 treatment of an individual patient, exercise day-to-day operational authority, make medical-staff
285 credentialing or privileging decisions, or replace the functions of the organized medical staff or the
286 Hospital’s internal quality-assurance and performance-improvement program.
12

287 (2) Committee members shall comply with applicable privacy and confidentiality laws
288 and shall complete initial and annual training concerning patient safety, patient and disability rights,
289 behavioral health law, confidentiality, ethics, conflicts of interest, and trauma-informed care.
290 (3) Information reported publicly by the Committee shall be deidentified and shall not
291 include information protected from disclosure by federal or District law.
292 (h)(1) The Committee shall use aggregate or deidentified patient information whenever
293 sufficient to perform its duties. Access to individually identifiable patient information shall be limited
294 to the minimum information reasonably necessary to perform a specific oversight responsibility and
295 shall comply with HIPAA, 42 C.F.R. Part 2, the District of Columbia Mental Health Information Act
296 of 1978, and other applicable privacy, confidentiality, and patient-rights laws.
297 (2) Before receiving individually identifiable patient information, each Committee
298 member shall complete privacy and confidentiality training and execute a confidentiality agreement.
299 A member shall not use or disclose protected information except as necessary to perform the
300 member’s official duties and as permitted by law.
301 (3) Nothing in this subsection shall limit or condition the access authority of the
302 District’s protection and advocacy system under 42 U.S.C. § 10805, 42 U.S.C. § 15043, or other
303 applicable federal law.
304 Sec. 107. Patient rights, independent advocacy, and anti-retaliation.
305 (a) The Hospital shall adopt a patient bill of rights in plain language and accessible formats.
306 (b)(1) The Hospital shall ensure that an independent patient-rights advocate has regular,
307 private, and timely access to patients, Hospital units, grievance information, and Hospital leadership,
308 including the Board and the Quality, Safety, and Patient Rights Committee, and access to patient
309 records with lawful authorization.
13

310 (2) The Hospital shall provide the District’s protection and advocacy system with
311 prompt and unimpeded access to the Hospital, its facilities, patients, employees, and records to the full
312 extent required by section 105 of the Protection and Advocacy for Mentally Ill Individuals Act of
313 1986, approved May 23, 1986 (42 U.S.C. § 10805), section 143 of the Developmental Disabilities
314 Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of 2000, approved October 30, 2000 (42 U.S.C. § 15043), and other
315 applicable federal law.
316 (3) Nothing in this act shall be construed to limit, condition, delay, or require additional
317 authorization for access granted to the District’s protection and advocacy system under federal law.
318 (c) The Hospital shall provide confidential and accessible methods for patients, employees,
319 contractors, families, legal representatives, and advocates to communicate concerns to the Board, the
320 patient-rights advocate, regulators, and oversight bodies.
321 (d) The Hospital, its employees, and its contractors shall not retaliate against a person for
322 making a good-faith report, filing a grievance, participating in an investigation, communicating with
323 the Board or an oversight body, or exercising a legal right.
324 (e) A violation of subsection (d) of this section shall be grounds for discipline or contract
325 remedies and may be reported to the Office of the Inspector General. This subsection does not limit
326 any other remedy available by law.
327 (f) Public reporting under this act shall be deidentified and shall comply with federal and
328 District privacy law. Board members and authorized staff may receive protected information
329 necessary to perform oversight duties and shall receive confidentiality training and execute
330 appropriate agreements.
331 Sec. 108. Least restrictive care and discharge accountability.
14

332 (a) The Hospital shall provide treatment in the least restrictive appropriate setting consistent
333 with clinical needs, public safety, court orders, and federal and District law.
334 (b) The Hospital shall maintain a real-time process to identify each discharge-ready patient, the
335 recommended type or level of community placement, tasks required for discharge, the entity
336 responsible for each task, and the length and cause of delay.
337 (c)(1) For a discharge-ready patient whose discharge has been delayed for more than 14 days,
338 the Chief Executive Officer shall require a case escalation involving the responsible Hospital
339 employees and system partners.
340 (2) For a delay exceeding 30 days, the matter shall be reported in deidentified form to
341 the Director and the Board Committee.
342 (3) For a delay exceeding 90 days, the Chief Executive Officer and Director shall
343 submit a written barrier-resolution plan to the Board.
344 (d) The Board shall monitor aggregate discharge delays and may require the Chief Executive
345 Officer to initiate the dispute-escalation process established under section 11.
346 Sec. 109. Relationship with the Department and other system partners.
347 (a) Within 180 days after the effective date of this act, the Hospital and the Department shall
348 execute an interagency agreement that delineates responsibility, funding, data sharing, and
349 performance standards for:
350 (1) Referrals, screenings, and admission pathways, including forensic admissions;
351 (2) Competency evaluations and restoration services provided at or through the
352 Hospital;
353 (3) Crisis and emergency-service coordination;
15

354 (4) Community-service, housing, benefits, and placement planning necessary for timely
355 discharge;
356 (5) Continuity of care before admission and after discharge;
357 (6) Shared information systems and data exchange;
358 (7) Emergency preparedness and system surge capacity; and
359 (8) Escalation and resolution of operational, clinical, placement, and funding disputes.
360 (b) The Hospital and the Department shall adopt shared performance measures concerning
361 avoidable admission, readmission, discharge delay, continuity of care, and community placement
362 stability and shall publish deidentified quarterly results.
363 (c) A dispute not resolved by the Chief Executive Officer and Director within 10 business days
364 shall be referred to the City Administrator. An unresolved dispute that materially affects patient
365 safety, patient rights, or discharge for more than 30 days shall be reported to the Mayor and Council.
366 (d) The Hospital may enter into additional agreements with a system partner as necessary to
367 carry out the purposes of this section.
368 Sec. 110. Saint Elizabeths Hospital Fund; budget and financial administration.
369 (a) There is established as a special fund the Saint Elizabeths Hospital Fund (“Fund”), which
370 shall be administered by the Hospital in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.
371 (b) Revenue from the following sources shall be deposited into the Fund:
372 (1) Annual appropriation;
373 (2) Third-party payments; and
374 (3) Grants and gifts.
375 (c) The Fund shall be used solely to operate and improve the Hospital and carry out the
376 purposes of this title.
16

377 (d) (1) The money deposited into the Fund shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of
378 the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.
379 (2) Subject to authorization in an approved budget and financial plan, any funds
380 appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation. (c)
381 The Board shall prepare an annual proposed operating and capital budget and a 5-year financial plan,
382 which shall be submitted to the Mayor for inclusion in her annual budget proposal to the Council.
383 (e) The Hospital shall provide monthly financial statements to the Mayor, Council, and Chief
384 Financial Officer and shall notify them within 5 business days of a material variance, cash-flow risk,
385 unauthorized obligation, or projected deficit.
386 (f) The Hospital may not borrow money, issue debt, pledge District revenue, or encumber
387 District real property except pursuant to an act of the Council.
388 Sec. 112. Procurement and contracting.
389 (a) Within 180 days after its first meeting, the Board shall adopt procurement rules that
390 require, at a minimum:
391 (1) Full and open competition except for documented emergency, sole-source, small-
392 purchase, or other limited exceptions;
393 (2) Written cost or price analysis and responsibility determinations;
394 (3) Conflict-of-interest, disclosure, recusal, and contractor-integrity safeguards;
395 (4) Participation goals and reporting for certified business enterprises;
396 (5) Public notice of solicitations and awards above thresholds established by rule;
397 (6) Contract-administration, performance-monitoring, and audit rights;
398 (7) Board approval of contracts above $1 million and Council review when required by
399 section 1-204.51 of the District of Columbia Official Code or other law; and
17

400 (8) Emergency-procurement reporting to the Board and Council within 7 days.
401 (b) Until rules adopted under subsection (b) take effect, the Procurement Practices Reform Act
402 of 2010 and rules issued under that act shall apply.
403 (c) The Hospital may engage a management or specialized clinical contractor, but a contract
404 may not transfer the Board's statutory duties or restrict access by District oversight bodies.
405 (d) The Hospital shall publish a searchable contract and purchase-order register, excluding
406 information protected from disclosure by law.
407 Sec. 113. Audits, transparency, reporting, and corrective action.
408 (a) The Board shall retain an independent auditor to conduct an annual financial-statement
409 audit and, at least once every 3 years, an independent governance and clinical-quality review. Reports
410 shall be submitted to the Mayor and Council and made publicly available
411 (b) The Hospital shall publish a quarterly public dashboard including deidentified measures of
412 census, admissions, length of stay, discharge-ready patients and delay duration, readmissions, serious
413 reportable events, restraint and seclusion, grievances, staffing, vacancies, turnover, overtime, contract-
414 staff use, regulatory findings, corrective-action status, budget, revenue, expenditures, and contract
415 awards.
416 (c) Within 30 days after receiving a final systemic finding from a regulator, accreditor, auditor,
417 the District's protection and advocacy system, or the Board, the Chief Executive Officer shall submit a
418 corrective-action plan to the Board. The plan shall identify responsible officials, measurable actions,
419 deadlines, resources, and validation methods.
420 (d) The Board shall notify the Mayor and Council within 5 business days of a condition that
421 poses an imminent threat to patient safety or Hospital operations, a loss or threatened loss of licensure
18

422 or certification, a material financial emergency, or substantial noncompliance with a corrective-action
423 plan.
424 (e) By February 1 of each year, the Hospital shall submit to the Mayor and Council an annual
425 report describing performance during the preceding fiscal year and progress on the strategic, quality,
426 workforce, capital, and financial plans.
427 (f) Reports required by this section shall be available in accessible electronic formats and shall
428 protect patient privacy and legally privileged information.
429 Sec. 114. Fiscal and quality distress response.
430 (a) The Board shall adopt objective early-warning indicators for fiscal distress, clinical-quality
431 deterioration, workforce instability, regulatory jeopardy, and persistent discharge delay.
432 (b) If an indicator is triggered, the Board shall require the Chief Executive Officer to submit a
433 remediation plan within 30 days and shall provide enhanced monthly monitoring until the Board
434 determines that the condition is resolved.
435 (c) If a condition remains unresolved for 90 days, or immediately if the condition threatens
436 patient safety, licensure, or financial solvency, the Board shall retain independent expertise and submit
437 an enhanced corrective-action plan to the Mayor and Council.
438 (d) The Mayor may direct the City Administrator to coordinate District assistance and may
439 recommend additional statutory action to the Council.
440 Sec. 115. Ethics, legal representation, liability, and tax status.
441 (a) A Board member shall not be personally liable for an action taken in good faith within the
442 scope of official duties, except for gross negligence, willful misconduct, or a knowing violation of
443 law.
19

444 (b) The Hospital may employ a General Counsel and retain outside counsel as permitted by
445 District law.
446 (c) The District may indemnify Board members, officers, and employees for acts within the
447 scope of their official duties to the extent permitted by law, and the Hospital may obtain liability and
448 directors-and-officers insurance.
449 Sec. 116. Transition from the Department.
450 (a) Within 90 days after the effective date of this act, the Mayor shall establish a Transition
451 Committee chaired by the City Administrator and including the Director, current Chief Executive
452 Officer of the Saint Elizabeths Hospital, Chief Financial Officer, Director of the Department of
453 Human Resources, Chief Procurement Officer, labor representatives, a patient or family
454 representative, a disability-rights representative, and other necessary officials.
455 (b) Within 180 days after the effective date of this act, the Transition Committee shall submit
456 to the Mayor and Council a transition plan that identifies:
457 (1) Functions, positions, personnel, appropriations, assets, liabilities, records,
458 information systems, licenses, contracts, and grants to be transferred from the Department or another
459 District agency to the Hospital;
460 (2) Functions that are to be retained by the Department or another District agency;
461 (3) A proposed transfer date and implementation schedule;
462 (4) Workforce protections and labor-consultation procedures;
463 (5) Continuity plans for patient care, pharmacy, food, facilities, security, information
464 technology, procurement, billing, legal services, and emergency operations;
465 (6) Interagency agreements required under section 11;
466 (7) Budget and capital requirements; and
20

467 (8) Risks, dependencies, and readiness criteria.
468 (c) The transition plan may provide for a phased transfer. No clinical or operational function
469 may transfer until the City Administrator certifies to the Mayor and Council that continuity of patient
470 care, payroll, procurement, financial management, information access, and regulatory compliance is
471 reasonably assured.
472 (d) The transfer date shall be October 1, 2028, or a later date established by act of the Council;
473 provided that, at least 60 days before that date, the City Administrator and Chairperson of the Board
474 shall jointly certify to the Mayor and Council that the Hospital is prepared to assume operational
475 responsibility without a material interruption in patient care, employee compensation, or regulatory
476 compliance.
477 (e) On the transfer date, the functions and associated positions, personnel, records, contracts,
478 assets, liabilities, and unexpended balances identified in the approved transition plan shall transfer to
479 the Hospital by operation of law.
480 (f) Existing licenses, certifications, privileges, contracts, orders, rules, and delegations relating
481 to transferred functions shall remain in effect until lawfully amended, replaced, expired, or revoked.
482 (g) The Hospital shall be the successor in interest for transferred contracts and obligations,
483 except as the transition plan or an act of the Council expressly provides otherwise.
484 (h) Every employee assigned to the current Saint Elizabeths Hospital and identified in the
485 transition plan shall be transferred from the Department to the Hospital without a break in service and
486 with the same base pay, accrued leave, retirement credit, health and other benefits, seniority, and other
487 rights and obligations that they had as employees of the Department before the transfer date.
488 (i) The Hospital shall assume and be bound by collective-bargaining agreements and personnel
489 contracts applicable to transferred employees, subject to their terms and applicable law.
21

490 (j) A hospital-specific personnel system shall include due process, merit-based hiring and
491 advancement, whistleblower and anti-retaliation protection, equal-employment requirements, ethics
492 and conflict rules, and preservation of accrued employee rights.
493 (k) The Hospital shall give a hiring preference to qualified District residents and shall maintain
494 workforce-development, apprenticeship, and succession plans.
495 (l) The Board shall receive quarterly workforce dashboards and shall approve an annual
496 staffing and retention plan.
497 (m) The Mayor shall submit conforming legislation to the Council no later than 270 days after
498 the effective date of this act to revise provisions of District law that assign transferred Hospital
499 functions to the Department.
500
501 Sec. 117. Rulemaking.
502 The Board, pursuant to pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative
503 Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may
504 issue rules to implement the provisions of this act. Proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for
505 a 45-day period of review, excluding days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or
506 disapprove the proposed rules by resolution within the review period, the rules shall be deemed
507 approved.
508
509 TITLE II. CONFORMING AMENDMENTS.
510 Sec. 201. Section 406(b) of the District of Columbia Government Comprehensive Merit
511 Personnel Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-139; D.C. Official Code § 1-604.06(b)),
512 is amended by adding a new paragraph (34) to read as follows:
22

513 “(34) For employees of the Saint Elizabeths Hospital established under Title I of the
514 Saint Elizabeths Hospital Independence and Governance Amendment Act of 2026, as introduced on
515 September __, 2026 (Bill 26-__), the personnel authority is the Board of Directors of the Saint
516 Elizabeths Hospital.”.
517 Sec. 202. Section 201(b) of the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8,
518 2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-351.01(b)), is amended as follows:
519 (a) Paragraph (11) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon in its
520 place.
521 (b) Paragraph (12) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in its
522 place.
523 (c) A new paragraph (13) is added to read as follows:
524 “(13) The Saint Elizabeths Hospital, established pursuant to Title I of the Saint
525 Elizabeths Hospital Independence and Governance Amendment Act of 2026, as introduced on
526 September __, 2026 (Bill 26-__).”.
527 Sec. 203. Section 2(e) of the Confirmation Act of 1978, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C. Law 2-
528 142; D.C. Official Code § 1-523.01(e)), is amended as follows:
529 (a) Paragraph (39) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon in its
530 place.
531 (b) Paragraph (40) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in its
532 place.
533 (c) A new paragraph (41) is added to read as follows:
23

534 “(41) The Board of Directors of the Saint Elizabeths Hospital, established by section
535 104 of the Saint Elizabeths Hospital Independence and Governance Amendment Act of 2026, as
536 introduced on September __, 2026 (Bill 26-__).”.
537 Sec. 204. Section 204(a) of the Freedom of Information Act of 1976, effective March 29, 1977
538 (D.C. Law 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-534(a)), is amended as follows:
539 (a) Paragraph (23) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon in its
540 place.
541 (b) Paragraph (24) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in its
542 place.
543 (c) A new paragraph (25) is added to read as follows:
544 “(25) Patient information and records concerning peer review, credentialing, quality
545 assurance, patient safety, personnel, or security, or information created or exclusively provided to the
546 Quality, Safety, and Patient Rights Committee of the Saint Elizabeths Hospital Board established
547 under Title I of the Saint Elizabeths Hospital Independence and Governance Amendment Act of 2026,
548 as introduced on September __ 2026 (Bill 26-_).”.
549 TITLE III. FISCAL IMPACT; EFFECTIVE DATE.
550 Sec. 301. Fiscal impact statement.
551 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
552 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
553 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
554 Sec. 302. Effective date.
555 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
556 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and a 30-day period of congressional review as
24

557 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
558 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
25